Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-506.01
Process; by
whom served.

(1) Unless the plaintiff has elected
certified mail service or designated
delivery service, the summons shall be served by the sheriff of
the county where service is made, by a person authorized by section 25-507
or otherwise authorized by law, or by a person, corporation, partnership,
or limited liability company not a party to the action specially appointed
by the court for that purpose.

(2) Certified mail service or
designated delivery service shall be made by the plaintiff or plaintiff's attorney.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 23;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 36;

Laws 1999, LB 319, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 8.

Workers' compensation cases, manner and time of service, see sections 48-174, 48-175, 48-175.01, and 48-190.